Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,131
State Treasurer; custodian of funds; disbursement.

The State Treasurer shall act as custodian of the money paid by the federal government to the state to carry out the agreement referred to in section 79-11,130 and shall disburse such money in accordance with the direction of the State Board of Education.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 12, p. 1006;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1456;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 913.